Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-507.01
Summons; proof
of service; return date.

(1) Within twenty days
after the date of issue, the person serving the summons, other than by certified
mail service or designated
delivery service, shall make proof of service to the court stating
the time, place, including the address if applicable, name of the person with
whom the summons was left, and method of service, or return the unserved summons
to the court with a statement of the reason for the failure to serve.

(2) When service is by certified mail service or designated delivery service, the plaintiff
or plaintiff's attorney shall file proof of service within ten days after the signed receipt is received or is available electronically,
whichever occurs first.

(3) Failure to make proof of service or delay in doing so
does not affect the validity of the service.

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 24;

Laws 2009, LB35, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB669, § 9.

Workers' compensation cases, manner and time of service, see sections 48-174, 48-175, 48-175.01, and 48-190.